Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Article 5. Dissolution.

Sec. 29.06.450.
Methods of dissolution.

Two petition methods may be used to initiate dissolution of a municipality:

petition to the Local Boundary Commission under regulations adopted by the commission; or

the local option method specified in AS

29.06.460

—

29.06.510

.

The department shall investigate a municipality that it considers to be inactive and shall report to the Local Boundary Commission on the status of the municipality. The commission may submit its recommendation to the legislature that the municipality be dissolved in the manner provided for submission of boundary changes in art. X, § 12 of the state constitution.

A borough is dissolved when its entire territory is included in a home rule or first class city or cities. A city is dissolved when all its powers become areawide borough powers.

History.

(§ 5 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Administrative Code. —

For standards for dissolution of cities, see 3 AAC 110, art. 9.

For standards for dissolution of boroughs, see 3 AAC 110, art. 10.

For standards for deunification, see 3 AAC 110, art. 11.

For procedures for petitioning and for other commission matters, see 3 AAC 110, art. 13.

Sec. 29.06.460.
Petition.

Voters of a municipality may file a dissolution petition with the department in the form prescribed by the department. The petition must be signed by a number of voters equal to at least 25 percent of the number of votes cast in the last regular election in that municipality.

The petition must include

the name of the municipality;

maps, documents, and other information showing that the municipality meets the standards for dissolution.

History.

(§ 5 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Administrative Code. —

For standards for dissolution of cities, see 3 AAC 110, art. 9.

For standards for dissolution of boroughs, see 3 AAC 110, art. 10.

For procedures for petitioning and for other commission matters, see 3 AAC 110, art. 13.

Sec. 29.06.470.
Standards.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, voters of a municipality may petition for dissolution when the municipality is free of debt, or, if in debt, each of its creditors is satisfied with a method of repayment and

the municipality no longer meets the minimum standards prescribed for incorporation by AS 29.05, or former AS 29.18.030 if it is a third class borough;

the municipality ceases to use each of its mandatory powers; or

the dissolution petition filed under AS

29.06.460

is signed by a number of voters of the municipality proposed to be dissolved greater than 50 percent of the number of votes cast in the last regular election in that municipality.

Voters of a city in a borough may petition for dissolution of the city if the borough consents to assume the city’s rights, powers, duties, assets, and liabilities. The consent must be ratified by a majority of borough voters voting on the question.

History.

(§ 5 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 1 ch 35 SLA 1988; am § 20 ch 58 SLA 1994)

Administrative Code. —

For standards for dissolution of cities, see 3 AAC 110, art. 9.

For standards for dissolution of boroughs, see 3 AAC 110, art. 10.

For procedures for petitioning and for other commission matters, see 3 AAC 110, art. 13.

Sec. 29.06.480.
Review.

The department shall review a dissolution petition for content and signatures, and shall return a deficient petition for correction or completion.

If the petition contains the required information and signatures, the department shall investigate the proposal.

History.

(§ 5 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Administrative Code. —

For procedures for petitioning and for other commission matters, see 3 AAC 110, art. 13.

Sec. 29.06.490.
Report and hearing.

The department shall report its findings to the Local Boundary Commission with its recommendation regarding the dissolution of a municipality.

The Local Boundary Commission shall hold at least one public hearing in the municipality proposed to be dissolved.

History.

(§ 5 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Administrative Code. —

For procedures for petitioning and for other commission matters, see 3 AAC 110, art. 13.

Sec. 29.06.500.
Decision.

The Local Boundary Commission may amend the petition and may impose conditions for the dissolution. If the commission determines that the dissolution, as amended or conditioned if appropriate, meets applicable standards under the state constitution and commission regulations, meets the standards for dissolution under AS

29.06.470

, and is in the best interest of the state, it may accept the petition. Otherwise, it shall reject the petition.

A Local Boundary Commission decision under this section may be appealed under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

History.

(§ 5 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 2 ch 35 SLA 1988; am § 21 ch 58 SLA 1994; am § 5 ch 86 SLA 1999)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1988, preceding the phrase “meets the standards” in the third sentence of (a) of this section, the word “petition” was substituted for “municipality” to correct a manifest error in ch. 35, SLA 1988.

Administrative Code. —

For standards for dissolution of cities, see 3 AAC 110, art. 9.

For standards for dissolution of boroughs, see 3 AAC 110, art. 10.

For standards for deunification, see 3 AAC 110, art. 11.

For procedures for petitioning and for other commission matters, see 3 AAC 110, art. 13.

Sec. 29.06.510.
Election.

The Local Boundary Commission shall immediately notify the director of elections of its acceptance of a dissolution petition. Within 30 days after notification, the director of elections shall order an election in the municipality to determine whether the voters desire dissolution. The election must be held at least 30 and not more than 90 days after the election order unless such timing would cause the election to be held between May 1 and November 1. If the director of elections receives notification after April 1, but before October 1, the election shall be held within 60 days after November 1. A person who is a voter of the municipality may vote in the dissolution election.

The director of elections shall supervise the election in the general manner prescribed by AS 15 (Election Code). The state shall pay all election costs.

The director of elections shall certify the election results. If dissolution is approved by a number of voters greater than 50 percent of the number of people registered to vote in the municipality, the director of elections shall declare that the municipality is dissolved effective on the date of certification.

History.

(§ 5 ch 74 SLA 1985; am §§ 3, 4 ch 35 SLA 1988)

Administrative Code. —

For procedures for petitioning and for other commission matters, see 3 AAC 110, art. 13.

Sec. 29.06.520.
Succession.

A municipality succeeding to a dissolved municipality succeeds to all rights, powers, duties, assets, and liabilities of the dissolved municipality. Otherwise, the state succeeds to those rights, powers, duties, assets, and liabilities. If the state succeeds to a dissolved municipality, the state may enter into a contract for the performance of duties or powers in the area of the dissolved municipality. However, a contract with an organization for the performance of duties or powers entered into under this section does not constitute recognition by the state of governmental powers of that organization.

History.

(§ 5 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 5 ch 35 SLA 1988; am § 22 ch 58 SLA 1994)

Cross references. —

For provisions relating to land of certain dissolved first and second class cities, see AS

44.33.755(a)(2)

.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The policy expressed by a full reading of Title 29 is that municipal alterations through such devices as mergers, consolidations, and dissolutions should not be used to arbitrarily enlarge the rights granted in AS 29.65. To permit a municipal alteration to trigger a new entitlement without regard to prior conveyances under AS 29.65 or 38.05.810 would result in certain municipal lands being counted twice in the determination of a municipal entitlement. December 14, 1993 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 29.06.530.
Application.

AS

29.06.450

—

29.06.530

apply to home rule and general law municipalities.

History.

(§ 5 ch 74 SLA 1985)